test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nekalcj_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - нэкалць: # Verb 'to pull' - partial paradigm
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нэкалӈадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нэкалӈан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нэкалӈа
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нэкалӈаниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нэкалӈадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нэкалӈахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нэкалӈаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нэкалӈадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нэкалӈаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалӈав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалӈар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалӈада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалӈамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалӈариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалӈадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалӈаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалӈараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалӈадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалъян
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалъяд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалъяда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалъяниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалъядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалъядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалъянаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалъядаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалъядоʼ   
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [нэкалӈаманзь, нэкалӈадамзь]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: нэкалӈанась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нэкалӈась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: нэкалӈанинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: нэкалӈадинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нэкалӈаханзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: нэкалӈаваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: нэкалӈадаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нэкалӈаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалӈавась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалӈарась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалӈадась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалӈаминзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалӈаринзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалӈадинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалӈаваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалӈараць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалӈадонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюнась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюнаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалъянась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалъядась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалъядась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалъянинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалъядинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалъядинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалъянаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалъядаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалъядонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1: нэкалкадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалкав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалкахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалкан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: нэкалˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалт
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалкаюнˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкланˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: нэкалӈая
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалӈамда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдамда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалъядамда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1: нэкалканиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалкамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалкахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалканиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2: нэкалдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалӈариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалъядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3: нэкалӈахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалӈамдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдамдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалъядамдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1: нэкалкаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалкаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалкахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалканаˮ  
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: нэкалтаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалӈараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалъядаˮ 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: нэкалӈаяˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалӈамдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалӈахаюдамдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалӈадамдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: нэкалъидмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: нэкалъин
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: нэкалъи
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: нэкалъиниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: нэкалъидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: нэкалъихʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: нэкалъиваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: нэкалъидаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: нэкалъиˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалъив
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалъир
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалъида
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалъимиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалъириʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалъидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалъиваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалъираˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалъидоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалъин
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалъид
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалъида
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалъиниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалъидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалъидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалъинаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалъидаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалъидоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: нэкалъидамзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: нэкалъинась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: нэкалъись
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: нэкалъининзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: нэкалъидинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: нэкалъиханзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: нэкалъиваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: нэкалъидаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: нэкалъиць  
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалъивась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалъирась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалъидась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалъиминзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалъиринзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалъидинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалъиваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалъираць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалъидонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюнась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюнаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалъихыюдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалъинась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалъидась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалъидась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалъининзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалъидинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалъидинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалъинаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалъидаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалъидонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: нэкалцудмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: нэкалцун
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: нэкалцу
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: нэкалцуниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: нэкалцудиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: нэкалцухаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: нэкалцуваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: нэкалцудаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: нэкалцуˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалцув
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалцур
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалцуда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалцумиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалцуриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалцудиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалцуваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалцураˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалцудоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалцухуюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалцун
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалцуд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалцуда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалцуниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалцудиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалцудиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалцунаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалцудаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалцудоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1: нэкалцадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2: нэкалцан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3: нэкалца
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1: нэкалцаниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2: нэкалцадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3: нэкалцахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1: нэкалцаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2: нэкалцадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3: нэкалцаˮ  
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалцав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалцар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалцада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалцамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалцариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалцадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалцаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалцараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалцадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюнаˮ
